inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_aa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninibaa
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: ginibaa
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: ninibaamin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: ginibaamin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: ginibaam
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: nibaa
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: nibaawag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: nibaawan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [nibaawan,nibaawa']
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: nibaam
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [ninibaasiin,ninibaasii]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [ginibaasiin,ginibaasii]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: ninibaasiimin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: ginibaasiimin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: ginibaasiim
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [nibaasiin,nibaasii]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: nibaasiiwag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: nibaasiiwan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [nibaasiiwan,nibaasiiwa']
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: nibaasiim
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: ninibaanaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: ginibaanaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: ninibaaminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: ginibaaminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: ginibaamwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: nibaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [nibaabaniig,nibaabaneg]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [nibaabaniin,nibaabanen]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [nibaabaniin,nibaabanen]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: nibaamwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: ninibaasiinaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: ginibaasiinaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: ninibaasiiminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: ginibaasiiminaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: ginibaasiimwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: nibaasiiban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [nibaasiibaniig,nibaasiibaneg]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [nibaasiibaniin,nibaasiibanen]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [nibaasiibaniin,nibaasiibanen]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: nibaasiimwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: ninibaanaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: ginibaanaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: ninibaaminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: ginibaaminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: ginibaamwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: nibaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: nibaadogenag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: nibaadogenan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [nibaadogenan,nibaadogena']
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: nibaamwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: ninibaasiinaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: ginibaasiinaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: ninibaasiiminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: ginibaasiiminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: ginibaasiimwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: nibaasiidog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: nibaasiidogenag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: nibaasiidogenan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [nibaasiidogenan,nibaasiidogena']
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: nibaasiimwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: nibaagoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: nibaagwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: nibaanigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: nibaasiigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: nibaasiigwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: nibaasiinigoban
